Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-186
Accidents occurring outside state; hearing; location; exception.

In all cases when the accident occurred outside of the State of Nebraska, the hearing before a judge of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court shall be at Lincoln, Nebraska, or in any other county in the state at the discretion of the compensation court, unless otherwise stipulated by the parties at least fourteen days before the date of hearing.

Laws 1935, c. 57, § 15, p. 195;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-176;

R.S.1943, § 48-186;

Laws 1975, LB 187, § 15;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 116;

Laws 1989, LB 261, § 1.

Where accident occurred in another state, appeal was taken to district court for Lancaster County. Krajeski v. Beem, 157 Neb. 586, 60 N.W.2d 651 (1953).

Nebraska act applies to workmen who are employed in Nebraska industries, even though injury may occur in performance of duties of workman in another state. McRae v. Ulrich, 147 Neb. 214, 22 N.W.2d 697 (1946).